Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Form and Effect.

Sec. 34.15.010.
Manner of executing conveyances.

A conveyance of land, or of an estate or interest in land, may be made by deed, signed and sealed by the person from whom the estate or interest is intended to pass, who is of lawful age, or by the lawful agent or attorney of the person, and acknowledged or proved, and recorded as directed in this chapter, without any other act or ceremony whatever.

In a deed or conveyance of the family home or homestead by a married man or a married woman, the husband and wife shall join in the deed or conveyance.

The requirement that a spouse of a married person join in a deed or conveyance of the family home or homestead does not create a proprietary right, title, or interest in the spouse not otherwise vested in the spouse.

Failure of the spouse to join in the deed or conveyance does not affect the validity of the deed or conveyance, unless the spouse appears on the title. The deed or conveyance is sufficient in law to convey the legal title to the premises described in it from the grantor to the grantee when the deed or conveyance is otherwise sufficient, and

no suit is filed in a court of record in the judicial district in which the land is located within one year from the date of recording of the deed or conveyance by the spouse who failed to join in the deed or conveyance to have the deed or conveyance set aside, altered, changed, or reformed; or

the spouse whose interest in the property is affected does not record, within one year in the office of the recorder for the recording district where the property is situated, a notice of an interest in the property.

History.

(§ 22-3-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1953)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in paragraph (d)(2) of this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.15.015.
Use of recorded master form.

If reference is made in a document to a recorded master form, a copy of the form, or so much of it as is incorporated by reference, must be provided to each party to the transaction by the party that furnished the document.

History.

(§ 28 ch 161 SLA 1988)

Sec. 34.15.020.
Conveyance by nonresident married woman. [Repealed, § 103 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 34.15.030.
Form of warranty deed.

A warranty deed for the conveyance of land may be substantially in the following form, without express covenants:

A deed substantially in the form set forth in (a) of this section, when otherwise duly executed, is considered a conveyance in fee simple to the grantee and the heirs and assigns of the grantee, with the following covenants by the grantor: (1) that at the time of the making and delivery of the deed the grantor is lawfully seized of an indefeasible estate in fee simple to the premises described, and has the right and power to convey the premises; (2) that at the time of making and delivery of the deed the premises are free from encumbrances; and (3) that the grantor warrants the quiet and peaceable possession of the premises, and will defend the title to the premises against all persons claiming the premises. The covenants are binding upon a grantor and the heirs and personal representative of a grantor as if written in the deed.

“The grantor (here insert the name or names and place of residence) for and in consideration of (here insert consideration) in hand paid, conveys and warrants to (here insert the grantee’s name or names) the following described real estate (here insert description), located in the State of Alaska.

“Dated this . . . . . . . . . . day of . . . . . ., 2. . . . . .”

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 1961)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “2...” was substituted for “19..” in accordance with sec. 105, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Sec. 34.15.040.
Form of quitclaim deed.

A quitclaim deed may be substantially in the following form:

A deed substantially in the form set out in (a) of this section, when otherwise duly executed, is considered a sufficient conveyance, release and quitclaim to the grantee and the heirs and assigns of the grantee, in fee of all the existing legal and equitable rights of the grantor in the premises described in the deed.

“The grantor (here insert the name or names and place of residence), for and in consideration of (here insert consideration) conveys and quitclaims to (here insert grantee’s name or names) all interest which I (we) have, if any, in the following described real estate (here insert description), located in the State of Alaska.

“Dated this . . . . . . . . day of . . . . . . . . . ., 2. . . . . .”

History.

(§ 2 ch 10 SLA 1961)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “2...” was substituted for “19..” in accordance with sec. 105, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Sec. 34.15.050.
Effect of quitclaim.

A deed of quitclaim and release for the form in common use is sufficient to pass all the real estate which the grantor can convey by a deed of bargain and sale.

History.

(§ 22-3-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.15.060.
Passage of fee.

The term “heirs” or other words of inheritance are not necessary to create or convey an estate in fee simple.

History.

(§ 22-3-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.15.070.
Passage of grantor’s entire estate.

A conveyance of real estate passes all the real estate of the grantor, unless the intent to pass a less estate appears by express terms or is necessarily implied in the terms of the grant.

A conveyance by a tenant for life or years purporting to grant a greater estate than the tenant possesses or can convey does not work a forfeiture of the estate, but passes to the grantee all the estate that the tenant can convey.

History.

(§§ 22-3-3, 22-3-4 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.15.075.
Receipt of after-acquired title or interest.

In addition to any estate passed by the grantor under AS

34.15.070

, whenever a person purports by a warranty deed, or, for Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act real property, a quitclaim deed, to grant real property in fee or in fee simple to a grantee and subsequently acquires title to, or an interest in, the real property, the subsequently acquired title or interest passes by operation of law to the grantee or the grantee’s successors.

In this section, “Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act real property” means real property that, at some point in that real property’s chain of title, was conveyed by the federal government under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) to a corporation established under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq.

History.

(§ 2 ch 21 SLA 2002; am § 41 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose regarding the 2002 enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 21, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 21, SLA 2002 provides that “[t]o the extent constitutionally permissible, [AS

34.15.075

enacted by] this Act applies to a title or interest that is acquired after the execution of a warranty or quitclaim deed if the title or interest is acquired on or after May 18, 2002, whether or not the warranty or quitclaim deed is executed before, on, or after May 18, 2002.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Legislation which enacted
AS

34.15.075

sought to affect conveyances of Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act real property by quitclaim deed, in some cases changing the common law rule that estoppel by deed does not apply when a conveyance is made by quitclaim deed. While the purpose of the legislation was to clear title related to subsurface use of the property when it is conveyed by quitclaim deed by village corporations, it raised concerns regarding retroactive application and equal protection.
2002 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

Sec. 34.15.080.
Covenants not implied.

No covenant is implied in a conveyance of real estate, whether the conveyance contains special covenants or not.

History.

(§ 22-3-5 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.15.090.
Covenant not implied in mortgage.

A mortgage may not be construed as implying a covenant for the payment of the sum intended to be secured by the mortgage. When there is no express covenant for payment contained in the mortgage, and no bond or other separate instrument to secure payment is given, the remedies of the mortgagee are confined to the land mentioned in the mortgage.

History.

(§ 22-3-6 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.15.100.
Conveyance of lands held adversely.

A grant or conveyance of land or interest in land is not void because at the time of the execution the land is in the actual possession of another claiming adversely.

History.

(§ 22-3-7 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.15.105.
Transfer fee covenants prohibited.

A document that conveys real estate may not include a provision that requires a subsequent grantee or grantor to pay a transfer fee to convey the real estate, except a document that conveys real estate may include a provision that requires a transfer fee if the fee is

a loan assumption fee or similar fee charged by a person holding a lien on the property; or

a fee or commission paid to a licensed real estate broker for brokerage services.

In this section, “transfer fee” does not include

a tax, assessment, fee, or charge imposed by a governmental authority;

a recording fee;

a fee payable to a nonprofit, mandatory homeowners’ association, condominium association, or cooperative under an applicable declaration or covenant; or

a fee payable to an organization described in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) or (c)(4) (Internal Revenue Code) used exclusively for cultural, educational, charitable, recreational, environmental, conservation, or similar activities that benefit the real estate conveyed.

A provision that violates this section is void.

History.

(§ 3 ch 39 SLA 2012)

Sec. 34.15.110.
Conveyances construed as creating tenancy in common.

A conveyance or devise of land or an interest in land made to two or more persons, other than to executors and trustees, as such, shall be construed to create a tenancy in common in the estate, except as provided in (b) of this section and AS

34.77.100

.

A husband and wife who acquire title in real property hold the estate as tenants by the entirety, except as provided by AS

34.77.100

or unless it is expressly declared otherwise in the conveyance or devise. The conveyance shall recite the marital status of the parties acquiring title to the real property.

History.

(§ 22-3-8 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 211 SLA 1970; am § 9 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The references to “AS

34.77.100

” in subsections (a) and (b) were substituted for “AS 34.75.100” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the section.

Sec. 34.15.120.
Remedy of tenant in common.

A tenant in common may maintain an action against a cotenant for receiving more than the fair share of the rents and profits of the estates owned by them in common.

History.

(§ 22-1-6 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.15.130.
Joint tenancy abolished.

Joint tenancy, with the exception of interests in personalty and tenancy by the entirety, is abolished. Except as provided in AS

34.15.110(b)

and AS

34.77.100

, persons having an undivided interest in real property are considered tenants in common.

History.

(§ 22-1-6 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 211 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS

34.77.100

” was substituted for “AS 34.75.100” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the section.

Sec. 34.15.140.
Tenancy by the entirety.

The right to hold an estate in land as tenants by the entirety, with the right of survivorship, is recognized.

[Repealed, § 91 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

The right of a spouse to convey to self and the other spouse as tenants by the entirety, or as tenants in common, is confirmed.

History.

(§ 22-1-6 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 62 SLA 1982; am § 91 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

For homestead exemption rights of tenants by entirety, see AS

09.38.010(b)

; for rights of creditors to seek partition of tenancy by entirety, see AS

09.38.100

.

Sec. 34.15.145.
Solar easement.

An easement obtained for the purpose of protecting the exposure of property to the direct rays of the sun must be created in writing and is subject to the recording requirements for other conveyances of real property.

An instrument creating a solar easement must include, but is not limited to,

the vertical and horizontal angles, expressed in degrees, at which the solar easement extends over the real property subject to the solar easement;

any terms or conditions under which the solar easement is granted or under which it will be terminated;

any provisions for compensation of the owner of the property benefiting from the solar easement in the event of interference with the enjoyment of the solar easement, or compensation of the owner of the property subject to the solar easement for maintaining the solar easement.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1980)

Collateral references. —

Landowner’s rights against interference with sunlight desired for purposes of solar energy.
29 ALR4th 349.

What constitutes, and remedies for, misuse of easement.
111 ALR5th 313.